Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.332

Miscellaneous state funds—Appropriations of 34th legislature to be paid from general fund.

From and after the first day of April, 1955, all appropriations made by the thirty-fourth legislature from any of the funds abolished by RCW 43.79.331, shall be paid from the general fund from the account to which the moneys of the abolished fund have been transferred by RCW 43.79.330.

[ 1965 c 8 s 43.79.332. Prior: 1955 c 370 s 3.]